test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-palj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - паль: # Noun 122 'eng ear/fin korva' - full paradigm
     паль+N+Sg+Nom: паль
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: палюм
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: палин
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пале
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: пальме̄н
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: палӣн
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: пале̄н
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: палюв
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: палӣн
     паль+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: паляныл
     паль+N+Sg+Loc: пальт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: палюмт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: палинт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: палет
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: пальме̄нт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: палӣнт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: пале̄нт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: палювт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: палӣнт
     паль+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: палянылт
# (Скрибник & Афанасьева 2007: 78)
     паль+N+Du+Nom: палиг
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: палягум
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: палягын
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: паляге
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: палягме̄н
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: палягы̄н
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: паляге̄н
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: палягув
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: палягы̄н
     паль+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: паляганыл
     паль+N+Pl+Nom: палит
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: палянум
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: палянын
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: палянэ
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: палянме̄н
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: паляны̄н
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: палянэ̄н
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: палянув
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: паляны̄н
     паль+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: палянаныл
#
     ха̄ль+N+Sg+Nom: ха̄ль
     ха̄ль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ха̄люм
     ха̄ль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ха̄лин
     ха̄ль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ха̄ле
     ха̄ль+N+Du+Nom: ха̄лиг
     ха̄ль+N+Pl+Nom: ха̄лит
